District of Columbia statutes.
29-705.05

No distribution on account of dissociation.

A person shall not have a right to receive a distribution on account of dissociation.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 505 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).